Maryland, session 2026, HB0766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
4–1002.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TOBACCONIST” MEANS A RETAIL TOBACCO BUSINESS
THAT HOLDS A TOBACCONIST LICENSE UNDER § 16.5–204 OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE.
(B) THERE IS A CLASS C–PCL (PREMIUM CIGAR LOUNGE) LICENSE.
(C) (1) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A
TOBACCONIST IF:
(I) THE TOBACCONIST OPERATES AN ESTABLISHMENT IN
WHICH PREMIUM CIGARS AND PIPE TOBACCO ARE SOLD AT RETAIL FOR
ON–PREMISES AND OFF–PREMISES USE; AND
(II) THE TOBACCONIST MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) (I) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY ISSUE ONE CLASS C–PCL
LICENSE PER 150,000 RESIDENTS OF A COUNTY.
(II) IF A COUNTY HAS FEWER THAN 150,000 RESIDENTS, A
LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY ISSUE ONE CLASS C–PCL LICENSE IN THE COUNTY.
(D) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO ALLOW A CUSTOMER TO
CONSUME ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ON THE PREMISES MONDAY THROUGH SUNDAY
FROM 10 A.M. TO 1 A.M. THE FOLLOWING DAY IF:
(1) THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE BROUGHT TO THE PREMISES BY
THE CUSTOMER;

HOUSE BILL 766 3
(2) THE CUSTOMER PURCHASES AND CONSUMES A PRODUCT SOLD BY
THE LICENSE HOLDER DURING THE TIME THE CUSTOMER IS ON THE PREMISES; AND
(3) THE LICENSE HOLDER HAS AT LEAST ONE EMPLOYEE PRESENT
AND WORKING WHO IS CERTIFIED IN AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER §
4–505 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) (1) THE LICENSED PREMISES IS EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THE CLEAN INDOOR AIR ACT UNDER § 24–505 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE.
(2) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD SHALL REQUIRE:
(I) A LICENSE APPLICATION TO INCLUDE A BUILDING PLAN
DEMONSTRATING SUFFICIENT AIR FILTRATION AND EXHAUST;
(II) A LICENSE HOLDER TO DISPLAY IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE
THAT SMOKING IS ALLOWED ON THE PREMISES; AND
(III) EACH EMPLOYEE OF A LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT TO SIGN
AN ACKNOWLEDGMENT THAT THE EMPLOYEE WILL BE SUBJECTED TO SECONDHAND
SMOKE.
(F) THE LICENSE HOLDER SHALL:
(1) HAVE AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS FROM THE SALE OF PREMIUM
CIGARS, PIPE TOBACCO, AND RELATED ACCESSORIES THAT ARE AT LEAST 70% OF
THE TOTAL DAILY RECEIPTS FROM THE ESTABLISHMENT; AND
(2) ANNUALLY SUBMIT TO THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND THE
LOCAL LICENSING BOARD, IN A FORM THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR REQUIRES, A
SALES RATIO COMPLIANCE REPORT.
(G) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE IS $100.
Article – Business Regulation
16.5–204.
(b) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE clerk of the circuit court shall issue to each applicant who meets the
requirements of this subtitle a license to act as an other tobacco products retailer or a
tobacconist.

HOUSE BILL 766
(2) THE CLERK MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE TO ACT AS A TOBACCONIST
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IF THE PLACE OF BUSINESS LISTED ON THE APPLICATION
FOR THE LICENSE IS ADJACENT TO A LICENSED HEALTH CARE FACILITY OR
LICENSED CHILD CARE FACILITY.
Article – Health – General
24–504.
Except as provided in § 24–505 of this subtitle, beginning on February 1, 2008, a
person may not smoke or vape in:
(1) An indoor area open to the public;
(2) An indoor place in which meetings are open to the public in accordance
with Title 3 of the General Provisions Article;
(3) A government–owned or government–operated means of mass
transportation including buses, vans, trains, taxicabs, and limousines; or
(4) An indoor place of employment.
24–505.
(A) This subtitle does not apply to:
(1) Private homes, residences, including residences used as a business or
place of employment, unless being used by a person who is licensed or registered under
Title 5, Subtitle 5 of the Family Law Article to provide child care, and private vehicles,
unless being used for the public transportation of children, or as part of health care or child
care transportation;
(2) A hotel or motel room rented to one or more guests as long as the total
percent of hotel or motel rooms being so used does not exceed 25%;
(3) A retail tobacco business that is a sole proprietorship, limited liability
company, corporation, partnership, or other enterprise, in which:
(i) The primary activity is the retail sale of tobacco products and
accessories; and
(ii) The sale of other products [is incidental] CONSTITUTES NOT
MORE THAN 30% OF THE RETAIL TOBACCO BUSINESS’S GROSS ANNUAL REVENUE;

HOUSE BILL 766 5
(4) Any facility of a manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or distributor of
tobacco products or of any tobacco leaf dealer or processor in which employees of the
manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, distributor, or processor work or congregate; or
(5) A research or educational laboratory for the purpose of conducting
scientific research into the health effects of environmental smoke.
(B) THE ALCOHOL, TOBACCO, AND CANNABIS COMMISSION SHALL
MAINTAIN A REGISTRY OF RETAIL TOBACCO BUSINESSES THAT ARE EXEMPT FROM
THIS SUBTITLE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, 2028, and
each July 1 thereafter, a person who holds a license to act as a tobacconist under §
16.5–204 of the Business Regulation Article and holds a Class C–PCL alcoholic beverages
license, as authorized under Section 1 of this Act, shall provide documentation to the
Executive Director of the Alcohol, Tobacco, and Cannabis Commission that shows not less
than 70% of the annual gross revenue from the business operated under both licenses is
derived from the sale of other tobacco products and related accessories.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
2, 2026.